Illinois, session 104th, SB1928.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Preventing Sexual Violence in Higher 5Education Act is amended by changing Section 35 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 155/35)7    Sec. 35. Sexual misconduct climate survey.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Base survey" means a base set of common questions 10recommended by the Task Force on Campus Sexual Misconduct 11Climate Surveys and approved by the Executive Director of the 12Board of Higher Education and Executive Director of the 13Illinois Community College Board. 14    "Student" means a person who is enrolled in a public or 15private degree-granting, post-secondary higher education 16institution, whether part-time, full-time, or as an extension 17student, including any person who has taken a leave of absence 18or who has withdrawn from the higher education institution due 19to being a victim of sexual misconduct.20    "Trauma informed" means an understanding of the 21complexities of sexual violence, domestic violence, dating 22violence, or stalking through training centered on the 23neurobiological impact of trauma, the influence of societal   SB1928 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1myths and stereotypes surrounding sexual violence, domestic 2violence, dating violence, or stalking, and understanding the 3behavior of perpetrators. 4    (b) Beginning after the effective date of this amendatory 5Act of the 104th General Assembly, each higher education 6institution shall biennially conduct a sexual misconduct 7climate survey of all students at the institution Each higher 8education institution shall annually conduct a sexual 9misconduct climate survey of all students at the institution. 10Each higher education institution's sexual misconduct climate 11survey shall include the base survey, which the Board of 12Higher Education or Illinois Community College Board, 13whichever is applicable, shall provide to the institution 14every 2 years. Each institution may append its own 15campus-specific questions to the base survey if questions do 16not require the disclosure of any personally identifying 17information by the students and are trauma informed. The Board 18of Higher Education and Illinois Community College Board, in 19consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, as 20necessary, shall review any complaints submitted by students 21who believe that questions included in the campus sexual 22misconduct climate survey are traumatizing. Within 120 days 23after completion of a sexual misconduct climate survey, but no 24later than one year after the Board of Higher Education or 25Illinois Community College Board, whichever is applicable, 26issued the last base survey, each institution shall compile a   SB1928 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1summary of the results of the sexual misconduct climate 2survey, including, but not limited to, the complete aggregated 3results for each base survey question, and shall submit the 4summary to the Board of Higher Education or Illinois Community 5College Board, as well as publish the summary on the 6institution's website in an easily accessible manner.7    (c) The Task Force on Campus Sexual Misconduct Climate 8Surveys is created. The Task Force shall consist of the 9following members:10        (1) the Executive Director of the Board of Higher 11    Education or a designee, who shall serve as chairperson;12        (2) the Governor or a designee;13        (3) one member of the Senate, appointed by the 14    President of the Senate;15        (4) one member of the House of Representatives, 16    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;17        (5) one member of the Senate, appointed by the 18    Minority Leader of the Senate;19        (6) one member of the House of Representatives, 20    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 21    Representatives;22        (7) the Attorney General or a designee;23        (8) the Director of Public Health or a designee; and24        (9) the Executive Director of the Illinois Community 25    College Board or a designee;26        (10) the following members appointed by the Board of   SB1928 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1    Higher Education:2            (A) one member who is a student attending a public 3        higher education institution in Illinois;4            (B) one member who is a student attending a 5        private higher education institution in Illinois;6            (C) one member who is a representative of the 7        University of Illinois recommended by the president of 8        the university;9            (D) one member who is a representative of private 10        colleges and universities recommended by the 11        Federation of Independent Illinois Colleges and 12        Universities;13            (E) one member who is a chief student service 14        officer at a public or private university; and15            (F) one member with expertise in institutional 16        research within a 4-year institution of higher 17        education; 18        (11) the following members appointed by the Illinois 19    Community College Board:20            (A) one member who is a student attending a 21        community college in Illinois;22            (B) one member who is a representative of the 23        community college system recommended by the Illinois 24        Council of Community College Presidents;25            (C) one member who is a chief student service 26        office at a community college;  SB1928 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1            (D) one member with expertise in institutional 2        research within a 2-year institution of higher 3        education; and 4        (12) (9) the following members appointed by the 5    Governor:6            (A) (Blank); one member who is a student attending 7        a public higher education institution in Illinois;8            (B) (Blank); one member who is a student attending 9        a private higher education institution in Illinois;10            (C) (Blank); one member who is a student attending 11        a community college in Illinois;12            (D) (Blank); one member who is a representative of 13        the University of Illinois recommended by the 14        president of the university;15            (E) (Blank); one member who is a representative of 16        the Illinois Community College Board;17            (F) (Blank); one member who is a representative of 18        private colleges and universities recommended by the 19        Federation of Independent Illinois Colleges and 20        Universities;21            (G) 3 members who are representatives of survivors 22        of sexual assault recommended by the Illinois 23        Coalition Against Sexual Assault, with one 24        specifically representing survivors in rural 25        communities and one specifically representing 26        survivors in urban communities;  SB1928 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1            (H) one member who is a representative of a 2        non-profit legal services organization that provides 3        legal representation to victims of campus sexual 4        assault in Illinois;5            (I) one member who is a representative recommended 6        by the Illinois Coalition Against Domestic Violence;7            (J) one member who is a representative recommended 8        by Equality Illinois;9            (K) one member who is a representative of an 10        immigrant rights advocacy organization;11            (L) one member who is a representative recommended 12        by the Every Voice Coalition or any successor 13        organization of the Every Voice Coalition;14            (M) one member who is a researcher with experience 15        in the development and design of sexual misconduct 16        climate surveys; and17            (N) one member who is a researcher of statistics, 18        data analytics, or econometrics with experience in 19        higher education survey analysis.20    The Task Force shall hold its first meeting as soon as 21practicable after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 22the 102nd General Assembly. Administrative and other support 23for the Task Force shall be provided by the Board of Higher 24Education. Members of the Task Force shall serve 2-year terms 25that commence on the date of appointment. Members shall 26continue to serve until their successors are appointed. Any   SB1928 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority. Any 2vacancy occurring other than by expiration of the term shall 3be filled for the balance of the unexpired term. A majority of 4the Task Force shall constitute a quorum for the transaction 5of any business. 6    Members of the Task Force shall serve without compensation 7but shall be reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in 8the performance of their duties if funds are available. 9However, the higher education institution in which a student 10member is enrolled may compensate that student for 11participating on the Task Force through a work-study program 12or by providing a stipend to support the work of the student 13member on the Task Force.14    (d) The Task Force shall develop and recommend to the 15Board of Higher Education and Illinois Community College Board 16the base survey for distribution to higher education 17institutions and provide the Board of Higher Education and 18Illinois Community College Board with any related 19recommendations regarding the content, timing, and application 20of the base survey. The Task Force shall deliver the base 21survey and related recommendations, including, but not limited 22to, recommendations on achieving statistically valid response 23rates, to the Board of Higher Education and Illinois Community 24College Board no less often than every 2 years and for the 25first time on or before July 31, 2023. Beginning after the 26effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General   SB1928 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1Assembly, Thereafter, the Task Force shall meet to recommend 2updates and revisions to the base survey in the year 2025 and 3in the year 2027 to review the results of the survey and to 4implement updates and improvements. The Task Force is 5dissolved after the completion of the 2027 base survey. After 6the dissolution of the Task Force, the Executive Director of 7the Board of Higher Education or a designee and the Executive 8Director of the Illinois Community College Board or a designee 9shall review the base survey every 2 years to consider any 10feedback that has been received and to implement improvements.11    (e) In developing the base survey, the Task Force shall: 12        (1) utilize best practices from peer-reviewed research 13    and consult with individuals with expertise in the 14    development and use of sexual misconduct climate surveys 15    by higher education institutions, specifically the survey 16    design should consider survey length and time to complete, 17    respondent experience, minimization of question 18    redundancy, and question skip logic and branching 19    dependent on the respondent answers;20        (2) review sexual misconduct climate surveys that have 21    been developed and previously utilized by higher education 22    institutions in Illinois and by other states that mandate 23    campus climate surveys;24        (3) provide opportunities for written comment from 25    survivors and organizations that work directly with 26    survivors of sexual misconduct to ensure the adequacy and   SB1928 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1    appropriateness of the proposed content;2        (4) consult with institutions on strategies for 3    optimizing the effectiveness of the survey;4        (5) account for the diverse needs and differences of 5    higher education institutions; and6        (6) review the base survey to ensure that the strategy 7    for gathering information is trauma informed. 8    (f) The base survey shall gather information on topics, 9including, but not limited to:10        (1) the number and type of incidents, both reported to 11    the higher education institution and unreported to the 12    higher education institution, of sexual misconduct at the 13    higher education institution;14        (2) when and where incidents of sexual misconduct 15    occurred, such as on campus, off campus, abroad, or 16    online;17        (3) student awareness of institutional policies and 18    procedures related to campus sexual misconduct;19        (4) whether a student reported the sexual misconduct 20    to the higher education institution and, if so, to which 21    campus resource such report was made and, if not, the 22    reason for the student's decision not to report;23        (5) whether a student reported the sexual misconduct 24    to law enforcement and, if so, to which law enforcement 25    agency such report was made;26        (6) whether a student was informed of or referred to   SB1928 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1    local, State, campus, or other resources or victim support 2    services, including appropriate medical care, advocacy, 3    counseling, and legal services;4        (7) whether a student was provided information 5    regarding his or her right to protection from retaliation, 6    access to school-based accommodations, and criminal 7    justice remedies;8        (8) contextual factors, such as the involvement of 9    force, incapacitation, coercion, or drug or alcohol 10    facilitation;11        (9) demographic information that could be used to 12    identify at-risk groups, including, but not limited to, 13    gender, race, immigration status, national origin, 14    ethnicity, disability status, sexual orientation, and 15    gender identity;16        (10) perceptions of campus safety among members of the 17    campus community and confidence in the institution's 18    ability to protect against and respond to incidents of 19    sexual misconduct;20        (11) whether the student has chosen to withdraw or has 21    taken a leave of absence from the institution or 22    transferred to another institution;23        (12) whether the student has withdrawn from any 24    classes or has been placed on academic probation as a 25    result of the incident; and26        (13) other questions as determined by the Task Force.  SB1928 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1All questions on the base survey shall be optional or shall 2offer the student the option to select "I prefer not to answer" 3as a response on the survey. 4    (g) The sexual misconduct climate survey shall collect 5anonymous responses and shall not provide for the public 6disclosure of any personally identifying information. No 7institution may use or attempt to use information collected 8through the sexual misconduct climate survey to identify or 9contact any individual student on campus, nor shall the 10results of the survey be used as the basis for any type of 11investigation or disciplinary or legal proceeding.12    (h) There shall be established within the Office of the 13Board of Higher Education and the Office of the Illinois 14Community College Board a data repository for all summaries of 15sexual misconduct climate surveys submitted by higher 16education institutions to the Board of Higher Education or 17Illinois Community College Board in accordance with subsection 18(b). The Board of Higher Education and Illinois Community 19College Board shall ensure that the sexual misconduct climate 20survey data submitted by all applicable institutions is 21available to the public in an easily accessible manner on the 22Board of Higher Education's or Illinois Community College 23Board's website.24    (i) Each higher education institution shall publish on the 25institution's website in an easily accessible manner:26        (1) the campus level results of the survey;  SB1928 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1        (2) the annual security report required under the 2    federal Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy 3    and Campus Crime Statistics Act;4        (3) the reports required under Section 9.21 of the 5    Board of Higher Education Act; and6        (4) a link to the Board of Higher Education's and 7    Illinois Community College Board's statewide data on 8    sexual misconduct climate survey data as set forth in 9    subsection (h).10    (j) The Board of Higher Education and Illinois Community 11College Board shall establish rules and procedures, including 12deadlines for dissemination and collection of survey 13information, consistent with the purposes of this Section and 14shall promote effective solicitation to achieve the highest 15practical response rate, collection, and publication of 16statistical information gathered from higher education 17institutions.18    (k) (Blank). Upon determination, after reasonable notice 19and opportunity for a hearing, that a higher education 20institution has violated or failed to carry out any provision 21of this Section or any rule adopted under this Section, the 22Board of Higher Education or Illinois Community College Board, 23whichever is applicable, may impose a civil penalty upon such 24institution not to exceed $50,000, which shall be adjusted for 25inflation annually, for each violation. The Board of Higher 26Education and Illinois Community College Board shall use any   SB1928 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10335 LNS 20409 b1such civil penalty funds to provide oversight of this Section 2and to provide funding to community organizations that provide 3services to sexual assault victims. The Attorney General may 4bring an action in the circuit court to enforce the collection 5of any monetary penalty imposed under this subsection (k). 6(Source: P.A. 102-325, eff. 8-6-21; 103-288, eff. 7-28-23.)